Maryland, session 2025, HB0333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–101.
In this subtitle, “Commission” means the Maryland Health Care Commission.
19–113.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CYBERSECURITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3.5–301 OF
THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 333
(3) “ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES” MEANS THE SERVICES THAT MUST BE
AVAILABLE IN THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM TO ENSURE THE CONTINUITY OF
CRITICAL CARE AND PATIENT SAFETY, INCLUDING DURING AN INCIDENT
DIMINISHING THE CAPACITY OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM.
(4) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM” MEANS THE ENTITIES AND
RELATIONSHIPS AMONG ENTITIES THAT ARE NECESSARY TO DELIVER TREATMENT,
PAYMENT, AND HEALTH CARE OPERATIONS.
(5) (I) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY” INCLUDES:
1. AN ELECTRONIC DATA INTERCHANGE
CLEARINGHOUSE;
2. A FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN
§ 19–3A–01 OF THIS TITLE;
3. A HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGE, AS DEFINED IN
§ 4–301 OF THIS ARTICLE;
4. A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN § 19–301 OF THIS TITLE;
AND
5. AN ENTITY IDENTIFIED BY THE COMMISSION IN
REGULATIONS TO BE INCLUDED IN THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM.
(II) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A CARRIER, AS DEFINED IN § 2–117 OF THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE; OR
2. A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER, AS DEFINED IN §
15–1601 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(6) “ZERO–TRUST” MEANS A CYBERSECURITY APPROACH:
(I) FOCUSED ON CYBERSECURITY RESOURCE PROTECTION;
AND
(II) BASED ON THE PREMISE THAT TRUST IS NOT GRANTED
IMPLICITLY BUT MUST BE EVALUATED CONTINUALLY.
(B) THE COMMISSION SHALL INCLUDE ON ITS STAFF AT LEAST ONE
EMPLOYEE WHO IS AN EXPERT IN CYBERSECURITY TO:

HOUSE BILL 333 5
(1) ADVISE THE CHAIRMAN AND MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION ON
MEASURES TO IMPROVE OVERSIGHT OF THE CYBERSECURITY PRACTICES OF
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITIES;
(2) CONSULT WITH THE OFFICE OF SECURITY MANAGEMENT ON
CYBERSECURITY ISSUES RELATED TO HEALTH CARE REGULATION; AND
(3) REPRESENT THE COMMISSION ON ANY WORKGROUP, TASK
FORCE, OR SIMILAR ENTITY THAT IS FOCUSED ON CYBERSECURITY AND ON WHICH
REPRESENTATION FROM THE COMMISSION IS REQUESTED OR REQUIRED.
(C) A HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY SHALL:
(1) ADOPT AND IMPLEMENT CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS THAT ARE
EQUAL TO OR EXCEED ANY STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION;
(2) ADOPT A ZERO–TRUST CYBERSECURITY APPROACH FOR
ON–PREMISES SERVICES AND CLOUD–BASED SERVICES;
(3) ESTABLISH MINIMUM SECURITY STANDARDS FOR EACH
OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVICE BASED ON
THE LEVEL OF SECURITY RISK FOR EACH DEVICE, INCLUDING SECURITY RISKS
ASSOCIATED WITH SUPPLY CHAINS; AND
(4) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 YEARS
THEREAFTER:
(I) UNDERGO A THIRD–PARTY AUDIT TO EVALUATE THE
ENTITY’S CYBERSECURITY PRACTICES AND RESOURCES BASED ON THE
CYBERSECURITY AND INFRASTRUCTURE SECURITY AGENCY’S CROSS–SECTOR
CYBERSECURITY PERFORMANCE GOALS OR A MORE STRINGENT STANDARD BASED
ON THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY’S FRAMEWORK;
AND
(II) SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION A REPORT THAT INCLUDES:
1. THE RESULTS AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
AUDIT;
2. THE DATE OF THE CYBERSECURITY AUDIT;
3. THE STANDARD USED TO EVALUATE THE ENTITY; AND

HOUSE BILL 333
4. THE NAME OF THE THIRD PARTY THAT CONDUCTED
THE AUDIT.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE
COMMISSION SHALL COLLECT CERTIFICATION OF A HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM
ENTITY’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE STANDARD USED IN THE AUDIT CONDUCTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(4) OF THIS SECTION FOR CYBERSECURITY–RELATED
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE STATE CHIEF INFORMATION
SECURITY OFFICER OR THE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE THAT INCLUDES:
(1) A GENERAL OVERVIEW OF CYBERSECURITY TECHNOLOGY AND
POLICIES USED BY HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITIES IN THE STATE, GROUPED IN
THE FOLLOWING MANNER:
(I) HOSPITALS;
(II) FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITIES;
(III) ELECTRONIC DATA INTERCHANGE CLEARINGHOUSES;
(IV) HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGES; AND
(V) ANY OTHER ENTITY THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS
SIGNIFICANT ENOUGH TO INCLUDE IN THE REPORT;
(2) INFORMATION ABOUT EACH CERTIFICATION COLLECTED,
INCLUDING:
(I) THE NAME OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY;
(II) THE DATE OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY’S
MOST RECENT CYBERSECURITY AUDIT;
(III) THE CYBERSECURITY STANDARD USED IN THE
CYBERSECURITY AUDIT OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY; AND
(IV) THE NAME OF THE THIRD PARTY THAT COMPLETED THE
CYBERSECURITY AUDIT;
(3) AN OVERVIEW OF ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES PROVIDED BY
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITIES;

HOUSE BILL 333 7
(4) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ENSURING THE CONTINUOUS DELIVERY
OF ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES DURING AND FOLLOWING A DISRUPTION TO THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM; AND
(5) RECOMMENDATIONS TO IMPROVE CYBERSECURITY FOR THE
GROUPS OF HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITIES IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
Article – Insurance
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Insurance Administration.
(k) “Commissioner” means the Maryland Insurance Commissioner.
2–117.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CARRIER” MEANS:
(I) AN INSURER AUTHORIZED TO SELL HEALTH INSURANCE;
(II) A NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLAN;
(III) A HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION;
(IV) A DENTAL PLAN ORGANIZATION; AND
(V) ANY OTHER ENTITY PROVIDING A PLAN OF HEALTH
INSURANCE, HEALTH BENEFITS, OR HEALTH SERVICES AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE OR THE AFFORDABLE CARE ACT.
(3) “ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES” MEANS THE SERVICES THAT MUST BE
AVAILABLE IN THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM TO ENSURE THE CONTINUITY OF
CRITICAL CARE AND PATIENT SAFETY, INCLUDING DURING AN INCIDENT
DIMINISHING THE CAPACITY OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 333
(4) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM” MEANS THE ENTITIES AND
RELATIONSHIPS AMONG ENTITIES THAT ARE NECESSARY TO DELIVER TREATMENT,
PAYMENT, AND HEALTH CARE OPERATIONS.
(5) (I) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY” MEANS:
1. A CARRIER; OR
2. A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER, AS DEFINED IN §
15–1601 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(II) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
GOVERNMENTAL PAYOR.
(6) “ZERO–TRUST” MEANS A CYBERSECURITY APPROACH:
(I) FOCUSED ON CYBERSECURITY RESOURCE PROTECTION;
AND
(II) BASED ON THE PREMISE THAT TRUST IS NOT GRANTED
IMPLICITLY BUT MUST BE EVALUATED CONTINUALLY.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL INCLUDE ON ITS STAFF AT LEAST ONE
EMPLOYEE WHO IS AN EXPERT IN CYBERSECURITY TO:
(1) ADVISE THE COMMISSIONER ON MEASURES TO IMPROVE
OVERSIGHT OF THE CYBERSECURITY PRACTICES OF HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM
ENTITIES;
(2) CONSULT WITH THE OFFICE OF SECURITY MANAGEMENT ON
CYBERSECURITY ISSUES RELATED TO HEALTH INSURANCE REGULATION; AND
(3) REPRESENT THE ADMINISTRATION ON ANY WORKGROUP, TASK
FORCE, OR SIMILAR ENTITY THAT IS FOCUSED ON CYBERSECURITY AND ON WHICH
REPRESENTATION FROM THE ADMINISTRATION IS REQUIRED OR REQUESTED.
(C) A HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY SHALL:
(1) ADOPT AND IMPLEMENT CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS THAT ARE
EQUAL TO OR EXCEED ANY STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE ADMINISTRATION;
(2) ADOPT A ZERO–TRUST CYBERSECURITY APPROACH FOR
ON–PREMISES SERVICES AND CLOUD–BASED SERVICES;

HOUSE BILL 333 9
(3) ESTABLISH MINIMUM SECURITY STANDARDS FOR EACH
OPERATIONAL TECHNOLOGY AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVICE BASED ON
THE LEVEL OF SECURITY RISK FOR EACH DEVICE, INCLUDING SECURITY RISKS
ASSOCIATED WITH SUPPLY CHAINS; AND
(4) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 YEARS
THEREAFTER:
(I) UNDERGO A THIRD–PARTY AUDIT TO EVALUATE THE
ENTITY’S CYBERSECURITY PRACTICES AND RESOURCES BASED ON THE
CYBERSECURITY AND INFRASTRUCTURE SECURITY AGENCY’S CROSS–SECTOR
CYBERSECURITY PERFORMANCE GOALS OR A MORE STRINGENT STANDARD BASED
ON THE NATIONAL INSTITUTE OF STANDARDS AND TECHNOLOGY’S FRAMEWORK;
AND
(II) SUBMIT TO THE ADMINISTRATION A REPORT THAT
INCLUDES:
1. THE RESULTS AND RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE
AUDIT;
2. THE DATE OF THE CYBERSECURITY AUDIT;
3. THE STANDARD USED TO EVALUATE THE ENTITY; AND
4. THE NAME OF THE THIRD PARTY THAT CONDUCTED
THE AUDIT.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL COLLECT CERTIFICATION OF A HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM
ENTITY’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE STANDARD USED IN THE AUDIT CONDUCTED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(4) OF THIS SECTION FOR CYBERSECURITY–RELATED
POLICIES AND PROCEDURES.
(E) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, AND EVERY 2 YEARS THEREAFTER,
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE STATE CHIEF
INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER OR THE OFFICER’S DESIGNEE THAT INCLUDES:
(1) A GENERAL OVERVIEW OF CYBERSECURITY TECHNOLOGY AND
POLICIES USED BY HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITIES IN THE STATE, GROUPED IN
THE FOLLOWING MANNER:
(I) INSURERS AUTHORIZED TO SELL HEALTH INSURANCE;

HOUSE BILL 333
(II) NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS;
(III) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS;
(IV) DENTAL PLAN ORGANIZATIONS;
(V) PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGERS; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER ENTITY PROVIDING A PLAN OF HEALTH
INSURANCE, HEALTH BENEFITS, OR HEALTH SERVICES AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
ARTICLE OR THE AFFORDABLE CARE ACT;
(2) INFORMATION ABOUT EACH CERTIFICATION COLLECTED,
INCLUDING:
(I) THE NAME OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY;
(II) THE DATE OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY’S MOST
RECENT CYBERSECURITY AUDIT;
(III) THE CYBERSECURITY STANDARD USED IN THE
CYBERSECURITY AUDIT OF THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY; AND
(IV) THE NAME OF THE THIRD PARTY THAT COMPLETED THE
CYBERSECURITY AUDIT;
(3) AN OVERVIEW OF ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES PROVIDED BY THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY;
(4) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ENSURING THE CONTINUOUS DELIVERY
OF ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES DURING AND FOLLOWING A DISRUPTION TO THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM; AND
(5) RECOMMENDATIONS TO IMPROVE CYBERSECURITY FOR THE
GROUPS OF HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITIES IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Information Technology.

HOUSE BILL 333 11
3.5–2A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Council” means the Maryland Cybersecurity Coordinating Council.
(c) “Office” means the Office of Security Management.
3.5–2A–07.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM” MEANS THE ENTITIES AND
RELATIONSHIPS AMONG ENTITIES THAT ARE NECESSARY TO DELIVER HEALTH CARE
TREATMENT, PAYMENT, AND HEALTH CARE OPERATIONS.
(3) “HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY” INCLUDES:
(I) A CARRIER;
(II) AN ELECTRONIC DATA INTERCHANGE CLEARINGHOUSE;
(III) A FREESTANDING MEDICAL FACILITY;
(IV) A HOSPITAL;
(V) A PHARMACY BENEFITS MANAGER;
(VI) A HEALTH INFORMATION EXCHANGE; AND
(VII) ANY OTHER ENTITY IDENTIFIED BY THE MARYLAND
HEALTH CARE COMMISSION OR THE MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION IN
REGULATIONS TO BE INCLUDED IN THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM.
(B) (1) A HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY SHALL REPORT, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A CYBERSECURITY INCIDENT, INCLUDING AN ATTACK ON A SYSTEM
BEING USED BY THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY, TO THE STATE SECURITY
OPERATIONS CENTER IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE OFFICE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND HEALTH
CARE COMMISSION AND THE MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION, SHALL
ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR A HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY TO REPORT A

HOUSE BILL 333
CYBERSECURITY INCIDENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
INCLUDING:
(I) THE CRITERIA FOR DETERMINING THE CIRCUMSTANCES
UNDER WHICH A CYBERSECURITY INCIDENT MUST BE REPORTED;
(II) THE MANNER IN WHICH A CYBERSECURITY INCIDENT MUST
BE REPORTED; AND
(III) THE TIME PERIOD WITHIN WHICH A CYBERSECURITY
INCIDENT MUST BE REPORTED.
(3) THE STATE SECURITY OPERATIONS CENTER IMMEDIATELY
SHALL NOTIFY APPROPRIATE STATE AND LOCAL AGENCIES OF A CYBERSECURITY
INCIDENT REPORTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) (I) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026,
THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR, THE COUNCIL, AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON THE NUMBER OF CYBERSECURITY INCIDENTS AND TYPES OF
CYBERSECURITY INCIDENTS REPORTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(II) A REPORT SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT IDENTIFY A HEALTHCARE
ECOSYSTEM ENTITY THAT REPORTED AN INCIDENT TO THE OFFICE OR A
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITY THAT WAS DIRECTLY AFFECTED BY AN INCIDENT
REPORTED TO THE CENTER.
3.5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Cybersecurity” means processes or capabilities wherein systems,
communications, and information are protected and defended against damage,
unauthorized use or modification, and exploitation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–113.

HOUSE BILL 333 13
(F) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES TO:
(1) PREVENT DISRUPTIONS TO THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM;
(2) ENABLE THE DELIVERY OF ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES BY THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM; AND
(3) SUPPORT RECOVERY FROM AN INCIDENT THAT DISRUPTS THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM.
Article – Insurance
2–117.
(F) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
CYBERSECURITY STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES TO:
(1) PREVENT DISRUPTIONS TO THE HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM;
(2) ENABLE THE DELIVERY OF ESSENTIAL CAPABILITIES BY THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM; AND
(3) SUPPORT RECOVERY FROM AN INCIDENT THAT DISRUPTS THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM.
Article – Public Safety
14–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Maryland Department of Emergency Management.
14–104.3.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE GUIDANCE TO THE MARYLAND
HEALTH CARE COMMISSION AND THE MARYLAND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION
REGARDING THE IMPLEMENTATION AND MONITORING OF CYBERSECURITY
REGULATORY STANDARDS FOR HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM ENTITIES.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONVENE A WORKGROUP TO REVIEW
CYBERSECURITY PRACTICES, THREATS, AND EMERGING ISSUES AFFECTING THE
HEALTHCARE ECOSYSTEM.

HOUSE BILL 333
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Cybersecurity” has the meaning stated in § 3.5–301 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
(3) “Essential capabilities” means the services that must be available in
the healthcare ecosystem to ensure the continuity of critical care and patient safety,
including during an incident diminishing the capacity of the healthcare ecosystem.
(4) “Healthcare ecosystem” means the entities and relationships among
entities that are necessary to deliver treatment, payment, and health care operations.
(5) (i) “Healthcare ecosystem entity” includes:
1. a carrier, as defined in § 2–117 of the Insurance Article;
2. an electronic data interchange clearinghouse;
3. a freestanding medical facility, as defined in § 19–3A–01
of the Health – General Article;
4. a health information exchange, as defined in § 4–301 of the
Health – General Article;
5. a hospital, as defined in § 19–301 of the Health – General
Article; and
6. a pharmacy benefits manager, as defined in § 15–1601 of
the Insurance Article.
(ii) “Healthcare ecosystem entity” does not include a governmental
payor.
(6) “Health care operations” has the meaning stated in 45 C.F.R. § 164.501.
(7) “Payment” has the meaning stated in 45 C.F.R. § 164.501.
(8) “Treatment” has the meaning stated in 45 C.F.R. § 164.501.
(9) “Workgroup” means the Healthcare Ecosystem Stakeholder
Cybersecurity Workgroup.

HOUSE BILL 333 15
(b) (1) The Maryland Department of Emergency Management shall convene a
healthcare ecosystem stakeholder workgroup to study and make recommendations to
improve the cybersecurity of the healthcare ecosystem in the State There is a Healthcare
Ecosystem Stakeholder Cybersecurity Workgroup.
(2) The purpose of the Workgroup is to develop strategies to:
(i) prevent cybersecurity disruptions to healthcare ecosystem
operations;
(ii) ensure the continuous delivery of essential healthcare ecosystem
services; and
(iii) enhance recovery efforts of the healthcare ecosystem following a
cybersecurity incident.
(2) The workgroup shall include:
(i) one representative of the Maryland Health Care Commission;
(ii) one representative of the Maryland Insurance Administration;
(iii) one representative of the Office of Security Management within
the Department of Information Technology;
(iv) representatives from healthcare ecosystem entities selected by
the Maryland Department of Emergency Management; and
(v) any other stakeholders or experts selected by the Maryland
Department of Emergency Management.
(3) The Maryland Department of Emergency Management may convene
subgroups considered appropriate to focus on specific concerns facing the healthcare
ecosystem or specific aspects of the healthcare ecosystem.
(c) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the Chairman of the Maryland Health Care Commission, or the
Chairman’s designee;

HOUSE BILL 333
(4) the Maryland Insurance Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s
designee;
(5) the Secretary of Emergency Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the State Chief Information Security Officer, or the State Chief Officer’s
designee;
(7) two representatives from the Subcommittee on Critical Infrastructure
of the Maryland Cybersecurity Council, appointed by the Chair of the Maryland
Cybersecurity Council;
(8) one representative from each of the following organizations, designated
by the head of the organization:
(i) one representative of the Cooperative Exchange;
(ii) one representative of the Electronic Health Record Association;
(iii) one representative of the Maryland League of Life and Health
Insurers;
(iv) one representative of the Maryland Hospital Association; and
(v) one representative of the Maryland Cybersecurity Association;
(9) one representative of a pharmacy benefits manager, appointed by the
Maryland Insurance Commissioner;
(10) the following representatives appointed by the Chairman of the
Maryland Health Care Commission:
(i) one representative of an electronic data interchange
clearinghouse;
(ii) one representative of a freestanding medical facility;
(iii) one representative of a large hospital;
(iv) one representative of a small hospital;
(v) one representative of an inpatient psychiatric hospital; and
(vi) one representative of a health information exchange; and

HOUSE BILL 333 17
(11) three representatives of a patient advocacy group, jointly appointed by
the Chairman of the Maryland Health Care Commission and the Maryland Insurance
Commissioner.
(d) The Chairman of the Maryland Health Care Commission, or the Chairman’s
designee, and the Maryland Insurance Commissioner, or the Commissioner’s designee,
shall cochair the Workgroup.
(e) The Maryland Health Care Commission and the Maryland Insurance
Administration shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(f) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(c) (g) The workgroup Workgroup shall:
(1) identify essential capabilities required for the delivery of health care
during a cybersecurity attack;
(2) identify functional requirements for the healthcare ecosystem to be
capable of providing the essential capabilities identified under item (1) of this subsection;
(3) identify and map all healthcare ecosystem entities in the State against
the essential health care capabilities and identified functional requirements;
(4) identify which healthcare ecosystem entities are needed, directly or
indirectly, to provide the essential capabilities identified under item (1) of this subsection;
(5) identify other issues related to cybersecurity in the healthcare
ecosystem develop an ecosystem cybersecurity threat and risk assessment based on the
essential health care capabilities and supporting functions;
(6) examine cybersecurity challenges affecting the healthcare ecosystem
based on the threat and risk assessment;
(6) (7) review best practices for cybersecurity and processes used in the
healthcare ecosystem, including NIST 800–207, NIST 800–207A, NIST 800–53A, the NIST
Cybersecurity Framework, HICP Technical Volume 1, and HICP Technical Volume 2; and
(7) provide guidance for the Maryland Health Care Commission and the
Maryland Insurance Administration regarding the adoption and maintenance of
cybersecurity regulatory standards.

HOUSE BILL 333
(8) make recommendations for adopting and maintaining cybersecurity
regulatory standards; and
(9) make recommendations for ensuring that essential capabilities and
supporting functions are resilient to disruption.
(d) (h) (1) On or before July January 1, 2026, the Maryland Department of
Emergency Management Workgroup shall submit an interim report defining the scope and
contents of the State’s healthcare ecosystem of its findings and recommendations to the
Governor, the Secretary of Emergency Management, the Chair Chairman of the Maryland
Health Care Commission, the Maryland Insurance Commissioner, the State Chief
Information Security Officer, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly.
(2) On or before July December 1, 2028 2026, the Maryland Department of
Emergency Management Workgroup shall submit a final report of the findings and
recommendations of the workgroup to the Governor, the Secretary of Emergency
Management, the Chair Chairman of the Maryland Health Care Commission, the
Maryland Insurance Commissioner, the State Chief Information Security Officer, and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2028.
SECTION 5. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025. Section 3 of this Act It shall
remain effective for a period of 4 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029 2027, Section 3 of
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.